src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x5_i
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** cont lexica for type n1-words ending with -i
:i x1_sg ;
+Pl+Nom:i^WG%>t PxK ;
+Pl+Gen:i%>en PxK ;
+Pl+Gen:i^WG%>tten PxK ;
+Pl+Ill:e^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! saunhoin 
+Pl+Ill:e^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  ! sauhnoin 
+Pl+Ine:e^WG%>iss^A PxK ;
+Pl+Ela:e^WG%>ist^A PxK ;
+Pl+All:e^WG%>ile PxxK ;
+Pl+Ade:e^WG%>il^A PxK ;
+Pl+Abl:e^WG%>ilt^A PxK ;
+Pl+Tra:e^WG%>i TRA ; 
+Pl+Ess:e%>in^A PxK ; !malmina, äitinä
+Pl+Abe:e^WG%>itt^A PxK ;


LEXICON n5_ie_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:^E2I R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^E2I PxK ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^E2I%>n     PxK ; !
+N+Sg+Gen:^E2I%>n     R ; ! 
+N+Sg+Par:^E2I%>^A      PxK ; ! alttaria
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^E2I%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^E2I%>st^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+All:^E2I%>lle PxxK ;
+N+Sg+Ade:^E2I%>ll^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Abl:^E2I%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ess:^E2I%>nn^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Tra:^E2I TRA ;
+N+Sg+Abe:^E2I%>tt^A PxK;

+N+Pl+Nom:^E2I%>t PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:%>itten PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^E2I%>tten PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>it^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ine:%>iss^A PxK ; !NY ändr neråt
+N+Pl+Ela:%>ist^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:%>ile PxxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:%>il^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:%>ilt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ess:%>in^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:%>i TRA ;
+N+Pl+Abe:%>itt^A PxK;


!! #### The nainen (nen) and hevonen (3nen) family

LEXICON nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bisyllabic nainen stem nai
nen_sg ;
nen_pl ;

LEXICON nen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnen_sg ;
!+N+Sg+Nom:s PxK ; #?
!+N+Sg+Gen:s PxK ; #?
+N+Sg+Gen:s R ;

LEXICON nen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnen_pl ;

LEXICON xnen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
xnen_sg ;
xnen_pl ;

LEXICON xnen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg:se 2cases ; !!≈ @CODE@ for  Ade, All, Ess lla, lle, nna
xnen_common_sg ;

LEXICON xnen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Pl:se%>i2 2cases ;
 xnen_common_pl ; ! all other cases

LEXICON 3nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** odd-syllabic hevonen stem hevose
+N: x3nen ;
+N+Sg+Gen:s R ;

LEXICON x3nen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
x3nen_sg ;
x3nen_pl ;

LEXICON x3nen_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg:se 3cases ; ! Ade, All, Ess lla, lle, nna
xnen_common_sg ;

LEXICON x3nen_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Pl:se%>i2 3cases ;
 xnen_common_pl ; ! all other cases

LEXICON xnen_common_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:nen       PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:se^WG%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:shee n_PxK ;    ! liikheen, säkheen
 +Sg+Ine:se%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:se%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:se%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:se%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:se TRA ;

LEXICON xnen_common_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:se^WG%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>itten PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:s%>ten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:s%>i^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:shii   n_PxK ;    !
 +Pl+Ine:s^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:s%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:s%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:s%>i2tt^A PxK ;

LEXICON 3cases
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Ade:%>ll^A PxK ;
+All:%>lle PxxK ;
+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;
+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
!+Ess+Err/Orth:%>n^A PxK ;

LEXICON 2cases
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Ade:%>l^A PxK ;
+All:%>le PxxK ;
+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;

LEXICON 3n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xn_ks ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WGkse%>n R ;

LEXICON xn_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
xn_ks_sg ;
xn_ks_pl ;

LEXICON xn_ks_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:s       PxK ; 
 +Sg+Gen:kse%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;


LEXICON xn_ks_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:kse%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>ten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>iss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:kse^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>ist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>ill^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>in^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ks%>i2 TRA ;


LEXICON n_äes !!identical to n_ks except N+Sg+Nom 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_äes ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WGkse%>n R ;

LEXICON x_äes !!xn_ks except N+Sg+Nom 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WGs       PxK ; 
 +Sg+Gen:kse%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;

 +Pl+Nom:kse%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>ten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>iss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:kse^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>ist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>ill^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>in^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ks%>i2 TRA ;


LEXICON 3n_ue
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
3x_ue ;
+N+Sg+Nom:s R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:de%>n R ;

LEXICON 3x_ue
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: 3x_ue_sg ;
+N: 3x_ue_pl ;

LEXICON 3x_ue_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:s PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:t%>hee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:e%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:e%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:e%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:e%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:e%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:te%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

LEXICON 3x_ue_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:e%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:ks%>i2en PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;

LEXICON 3n_ime
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGn       R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:me%>n R ;
  3n_ime_sg ;
  3n_ime_pl ;

LEXICON 3n_ime_sg 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_ime_sg ;

LEXICON 3n_ime_pl 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_ime_pl ;

LEXICON x_ime_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WGn       PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:me%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:^WGn%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:m%>hee n_PxK ; !kirjaimheen
 +Sg+Ine:me%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:me%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:me%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:me%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:me%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:me%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:me%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:me TRA ;

LEXICON x_ime_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:me%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:n%>ten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:m%>i^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:m%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:m%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:m%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:m%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:m%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:m%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:m%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:m%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:mi2 TRA ;

LEXICON nas ! tehas
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: xnas ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>^Vn R ;

LEXICON xnas
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 xnas_sg ;
 xnas_pl ;

LEXICON xnas_sg ! ankerias:ankeria
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WGs       PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn PxK ; !salmhaan
 +Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn PxK ; !salhmaan
 +Sg+Par:^WGs%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vshee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^Vshee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^HMETA%>h^V^Vss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>h^V^Vss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^HMETA%>h^V^Vst^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>h^V^Vst^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^HMETA%>h^V^Vle PxxK ;
 +Sg+All:^HMET2%>h^V^Vle PxxK ; !maitosalhmaala
 +Sg+Ade:^HMETA%>h^V^Vl^A PxK ; !maitosalmhaala
 +Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>h^V^Vl^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^HMETA%>h^V^Vlt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>h^V^Vlt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:^HMETA%>h^V^Vtt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:^HMET2%>h^V^Vtt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^HMETA%>h^V^V TRA ;
 +Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>h^V^V TRA ;
