src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kiertokauppias:kiertokauppia nas ;
pohjanen:pohja 3nen ;
kotapieljas:kotapielja nas ;
lamphaannahkaset:lamphaan#nahka nen_pl ;
keskenaikanen:kesken#aika 3nen ;
takkanen:takka 3nen ;
punikas:punikka nas ;
ottikas:ottikka nas ;
jurokas:jurokka nas ;
nutukas:nutukka nas ;
pitokangas:pito#kanka nas ;
kuningas:kuninka nas ;
keränalanen:keränala 3nen ;
talas:tala nas ;
sapilas:sapila nas ;
vuolas:vuola nas ;
viiminenhammas:viiminen#hamma nas ;
nurmituomas:nurmi#tuoma nas ;
outosananen:outosana 3nen ;
kuopaset:kuopa nen_pl ;
kumakkasaapas:kumakka#saappa nas ;
tarvas:tarpa nas ;
kieras:kiera nas ;
lakiviisas:laki#viisa nas ;
parempiosanen:parempiosa 3nen ;
puuvarras:puu#varta nas ;
nenäratas:nenä#ratta nas ;
voilautanen:voilauta 3nen ;
puas:pua nas ;
äes:äke n_äes ;
kirves:kirve nas ;
maitovaain:maitovaai 3n_ime ;
kivunalhainen:kivunalhai 3nen ;
paukkiainen:paukkiai nen ;
ampiainen:ampiai nen ;
vaapsiainen:vaapsiai nen ;
pulmukainen:pulmukai nen ;
karjalainen:karjalai nen ;
puolalainen:puolalai nen ;
kinalainen:kinalai nen ;
saksalainen:saksalai nen ;
ummikkoruottalainen:ummikkoruottalai nen ;
kielain:kielai 3n_ime ;
puolilainen:puolilai nen ;
järvilainen:järvilai nen ;
tienoolainen:tienoolai nen ;
kuolaimet:kuolai 3n_ime_pl ;
koululainen:koululai nen ;
jänkkämuuhrainen:jänkkämuuhrai 3nen ;
sain:sai 3n_ime ;
pellavainen:pellavai nen ;
jäänhalkein:jäänhalkei 3n_ime ;
kiehin:kiehi 3n_ime ;
pohin:pohi 3n_ime ;
laijin:laiji 3n_ime ;
lokkinen:lokki 3nen ;
paskahärkin:paskahärkki 3n_ime ;
polkimet:polki 3n_ime_pl ;
piironki:piironke n5_ie_odd ;
klaffipiironki:klaffi#piironke n5_ie_odd ;
yin:yki 3n_ime ;
puhelin:puheli 3n_ime ;
kaapeli:kaapele n5_ie_odd ;
kapaapeli:kapaapele n5_ie_odd ;
saapeli:saapele n5_ie_odd ;
koopeli:koopele n5_ie_odd ;
temppeli:temppele n5_ie_odd ;
pimppeli:pimppele n5_ie_odd ;
tämppeli:tämppele n5_ie_odd ;
koppeli:koppele n5_ie_odd ;
juupeli:juupele n5_ie_odd ;
kyöpeli:kyöpele n5_ie_odd ;
kööpeli:kööpele n5_ie_odd ;
mööpeli:mööpele n5_ie_odd ;
naimamööpeli:naima#mööpele n5_ie_odd ;
eilinen:eili 3nen ;
laarilinen:laarili nen ;
kiululinen:kiululi nen ;
syli:syle n5_ie_odd ;
puusyli:puu#syle n5_ie_odd ;
houraaminen:houraami nen ;
kasuaminen:kasuami nen ;
prupleemi:prupleeme n5_ie_odd ;
prupleemi:prupleeme n5_ie_odd ;
systeemi:systeeme n5_ie_odd ;
pannusysteemi:pannu#systeeme n5_ie_odd ;
villi-ihminen:villi-ihmi 3nen ;
vaisulämmin:vaisu#lämmi 3n_ime ;
velkominen:velkomi nen ;
tuominen:tuomi 3nen ;
ruumis:ruumi nas ;
verentypheyttäminen:verentypheyttämi nen ;
lehmänannin:lehmänanni 3n_ime ;
hormooni:hormoone n5_ie_odd ;
talvijänis:talvi#jäni 3n_ks ;
uurretoin:uurretoi 3n_ime ;
tarvoin:tarvoi 3n_ime ;
pohjamarin:pohjamari 3n_ime ;
alttari:alttare n5_ie_odd ;
viisäyrinen:viisäyri 3nen ;
pikkutyttärinen:pikkutyttäri nen ;
purasin:purasi 3n_ime ;
kalvosin:kalvosi 3n_ime ;
uistin:uisti 3n_ime ;
luistin:luisti 3n_ime ;
kannatin:kannatti 3n_ime ;
kesätin:kesätti 3n_ime ;
kaksnieluinen:kaksnielui 3nen ;
tiitiäinen:tiitiäi nen ;
kemiläinen:kemiläi nen ;
määkyväinen:määkyväi nen ;
makkaransyäin:makkarans#yäi 3n_ime ;
istun:istu 3n_ime ;
pohjonen:pohjo 3nen ;
rikos:riko 3n_ks ;
kinos:kino 3n_ks ;
peiponen:peipo 3nen ;
tappauskeitos:tappauskeito 3n_ks ;
tammahevonen:tammahevo 3nen ;
ratsuhevonen:ratsuhevo 3nen ;
liuvos:liuvo 3n_ks ;
jouttiäes:jouttiäke n_äes ;
präiskiläs:präiskilä nas ;
matkaeväs:matka#evä nas ;
kaihtimet:kaihti 3n_ime_pl ;
hohtimet:hohti 3n_ime_pl ;
pohtimet:pohti 3n_ime_pl ;
kerittimet:keritti 3n_ime_pl ;
puu'us:puu'u 3n_ks ;
vaphaus:vaphau 3n_ks ;
mettätiikaus:mettä#tiikau 3n_ks ;
merkkaus:merkkau 3n_ks ;
lullaus:lullau 3n_ks ;
toppaus:toppau 3n_ks ;
syänkohtaus:syänkohtau 3n_ks ;
syänhalvaus:syänhalvau 3n_ks ;
fariseeus:fariseeu 3n_ue ;
oikheus:oikheu 3n_ue ; ! xxx
kuolheus:kuolheu 3n_ue ;
laupheus:laupheu 3n_ue ;
katheus:katheu 3n_ue ;
lahkeus:lahkeu 3n_ue ;
mielihaikeus:mielihaikeu 3n_ue ;
tappo-oikeus:tappo-oikeu 3n_ue ;
käräjäoikeus:käräjäoikeu 3n_ue ;
kulkeus:kulkeu 3n_ue ;
falskeus:falskeu 3n_ue ;
nuoskeus:nuoskeu 3n_ue ;
umpeus:umpeu 3n_ue ;
kunteus:kunteu 3n_ue ;
lauveus:lauveu 3n_ue ;
nuljus:nulju 3n_ks ;
keskunen:kesku 3nen ;
lahmus:lahmu 3n_ks ;
nimisormus:nimisormu 3n_ks ;
paljous:paljou 3n_ks ;
kirous:kirou 3n_ks ;
latus:latu 3n_ks ;
vastus:vastu 3n_ks ;
kakssoutunen:kakssoutu 3nen ;
ilfheys:ilfhey 3n_ue ;
lempheys:lemphey 3n_ue ;
nyrheys:nyrhey 3n_ue ;
fiineys:fiiney 3n_ue ;
lempeys:lempey 3n_ue ;
virreys:virrey 3n_ue ;
leveys:levey 3n_ue ;
fiiniys:fiiniy 3n_ue ;
kryhmynen:kryhmy 3nen ;
väsymys:väsymy 3n_ks ;
läksytys:läksyty 3n_ks ;
hyökkäys:hyökkäy 3n_ks ;
lokkikärpänen:lokkikärpä 3nen ;
paskaryyppönen:paska#ryyppö 3nen ;
koopisti:koopiste n5_ie_odd ;
